District of Columbia statutes.
6-301.03

Repealed

District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency — Established; composition; appointment; Chairman; term of office; vacancies; compensation; corporate powers; procedures for disposition of claims; facilities donated as local noncash grant-in-aid; maintenance of rental property; waiver of special assessments.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 793, ch. 736, § 4
Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 778, Pub. L. 93-198, title II, § 201(a)-(c)
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 18, 36 DCR 492
Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 31(a), 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-188, § 3(2), 49 DCR 6516
1981 Ed., § 5-803.
1973 Ed., § 5-703.
1981 Ed., § 5-804.
1973 Ed., § 5-704.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 9(a)(2) of the Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporation Transfer Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-66, Feb. 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2276).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 10 of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-13, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6589).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(a)(1), (b) of Redevelopment Land Agency-RLA Revitalization Corporate Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-259, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1424).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 232(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 232(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For purported temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(c) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For purported temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(c) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Section 33(b)(1) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided that § 31(a) shall take effect on the latter of: (A) September 11, 1998; or (B) the Dates determined by the Board, but not later than one year after the initial meeting of the Board.

Transfer of United States property: Act of September 26, 1978, 92 Stat. 749, Pub. L. 95-385, provides for the transfer of certain United States property to the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency.

Compensation for board members of Agency: Section 120(c) of Pub. L. 103-127, 107 Stat. 1346, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1994, provided that notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Board of Directors of the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency shall be paid, during any fiscal year, a per diem compensation at a rate established by the Mayor.

D.C. Law 14-188 repealed this section on a permanent basis. D.C. Law 15-39 also purported to repeal this section. The repeal by D.C. Law 15-39 was ineffective.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.